Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.130

Service of orders.

An injunction order or an order requiring a person to attend and be examined made as prescribed in this chapter must be served by delivering to the person to be served a certified copy of the original order and a copy of the affidavit on which it was made. In the case of an order requiring a person to attend and be examined and not imposing injunctive restraints, a noncertified copy may be served if the noncertified copy bears a stamp or notation indicating the name of the judge or commissioner who signed the original order, and a stamp or notation indicating the original order has been filed with the court.

Service upon a corporation is sufficient if made upon an officer, to whom a copy of a summons must be delivered. Where an order is personally served upon a corporation, unless the officer to be served is specially designated in the order, the order may be served upon any person upon whom a summons can be served.

[ 1995 c 73 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 38 s 1; 1893 c 133 s 13; RRS s 625.]